Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3. Damages

§ 12-8-301.
Limitation of liability.

No person who has legally provided alcoholic liquor or malt beverage to any other person is liable for damages caused by the intoxication of the other person.

This section does not affect the liability of the intoxicated person for damages.

This section does not affect the liability of the licensee or person if the alcoholic liquor or malt beverage was sold or provided in violation of title 12 of the Wyoming statutes.

For purposes of this section “licensee” is as defined in W.S. 12-1-101(a)(viii) and includes the licensee’s employee or employees.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 205, § 1; 1986, ch. 6, § 1.

Liability of homeowners for intoxicated minors. —

In a case where teenage boys who were staying on the homeowners' property became intoxicated and proceeded to get in car wreck which resulted in the death of two of the boys and injuries to a third boy, because the injured boy's parents' complaint did not allege that the homeowners provided the alcohol to the boys and it did not allege that they knew or should have known that the boys would soon be driving an automobile, it was not an abuse of discretion for the district court to dismiss the parents' complaint for failure to state a claim upon which relief could be granted pursuant to W.R.C.P. 12(b)(6). Daniels v. Carpenter, 2003 WY 11, 62 P.3d 555,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2003).

Liquor vendor under common-law duty of care. —

The rule of McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983), which held that a vendor of liquor owed a duty of care required of a reasonable person in light of all the circumstances, applies prospectively only, to claims or causes of action that accrue after the date of its publication, June 28, 1983. Adkins v. Sky Blue, 701 P.2d 549,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 486

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to enactment of this section).

Statute was not unconstitutional. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

12-8-301

did not infringe upon the fundamental right of access to the courts established by Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 8 or upon any other fundamental interest, including equal protection of the law, by creating a cause of action against persons who illegally sold or served alcohol to people who caused injuries, while not recognizing the same cause of action against persons who legally sold or served alcohol. Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 24, 2003).

This section does not violate the equal protection provisions of the state and federal constitutions.
Baessler v. Freier, 2011 WY 125, 258 P.3d 720,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2011).

This section is not a special law for purposes Wyo. Const. art. III, § 27. The statute has general application across the State, applies to all liquor vendors, and applies to all liquor vendors in the exact same fashion.
Baessler v. Freier, 2011 WY 125, 258 P.3d 720,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2011).

Failure to state a claim against alcohol providers. —

Wrongful death suit against the owners of a bar and salon that provided a drunk driver with alcohol was properly dismissed for failure to state a claim under this section.
Baessler v. Freier, 2011 WY 125, 258 P.3d 720,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2011).

Liability prohibited under municipal ordinances. —

This section does not encompass municipal ordinances in the concept of “legally” as used therein, and prohibits liability under municipal ordinances.
Baessler v. Freier, 2011 WY 125, 258 P.3d 720,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

Daley v. Wenzel, 2001 WY 80, 30 P.3d 547,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: alcoholic beverages, 42 ALR4th 253.

Social host's liability for injuries incurred by third parties as a result of intoxicated guest's negligence, 62 ALR4th 16.

Tort liability of college or university for injury suffered by student as a result of own or fellow student's intoxication, 62 ALR4th 81.